Utah statutes.
76-8-708.   Enforcement of rules or regulations of institutions -- Privilege of information acquired in proceedings.

(1)  Nothing herein shall be deemed to prevent any state institution of higher education from proceeding to enforce against any invitee, student, faculty member, or other employee of an institution any rule or regulation of the institution in accordance with procedural regulations as may be established by the president and institutional council of the institution and as authorized by the state board of higher education.

(2)  The chief administrative officer of any state institution of higher education, or any person designated by him to enforce any rule or regulation against any student, faculty member, or other employee of the institution cannot be examined as to information, written or oral, which has been acquired by him in the process of the enforcement proceedings or related activities, without the permission of the person against whom the rule or regulation was to be enforced.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

